Tennessee, session 114, SB0402.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 47, Chapter 18, is amended by adding
the following as a new part:
47-18-5801.
As used in this part:
(1) "Consumer report" has the same meaning as defined by 15 U.S.C. §
1681a(d);
(2) "Consumer reporting agency" has the same meaning as defined by
15 U.S.C. § 1681a(f);
(3) "Debt collections agency" means a person or entity hired to collect or
attempt to collect debts due or asserted to be due to another person or entity;
(4) "Healthcare provider" means a healthcare practitioner, person, or
facility licensed, authorized, certified, registered, or regulated under title 33, title
63, or title 68; and
(5) "Medical debt" means debt arising from the receipt of healthcare
services and related expenses.
47-18-5802.
SB0402
000076
- 1 -

(a) Beginning July 1, 2025, a healthcare provider shall not report a patient's
medical debt to a consumer reporting agency. This section does not prohibit a
healthcare provider from reporting a patient's medical debt to a debt collections agency.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2025, a consumer reporting agency shall not include on a
consumer report a record of medical debt.
(c) If a consumer reporting agency includes information in a consumer report in
violation of subsection (b), then the person to whom the consumer report applies may
dispute the completeness or accuracy of such information, as provided under the federal
Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. § 1681i).
47-18-5803.
(a) A violation of this part constitutes a violation of the Tennessee Consumer
Protection Act of 1977, compiled in part 1 of this chapter. A violation of this part
constitutes an unfair or deceptive act or practice affecting trade or commerce and is
subject to the penalties and remedies as provided in the Tennessee Consumer
Protection Act of 1977, in addition to the penalties and remedies in this part.
(b) The attorney general and reporter has all of the investigative and
enforcement authority that the attorney general and reporter has under the Tennessee
Consumer Protection Act of 1977 relating to alleged violations of this part. The attorney
general and reporter may institute any proceedings involving alleged violations of this
part in Davidson County circuit or chancery court or any other venue otherwise permitted
by law.
(c) Costs of any kind or nature cannot be taxed against the attorney general and
reporter or this state in actions commenced under this part.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 000076